Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-273
Appointed counsel and guardians ad litem; fees; allowance.

(1) Counsel and guardians ad litem appointed outside of the guardian ad litem division as provided in section 43-272 shall apply to the court before which the proceedings were had for fees for services performed. The court upon hearing the application shall fix reasonable fees. The county board of the county wherein the proceedings were had shall allow the account, bill, or claim presented by any attorney or guardian ad litem for services performed under section 43-272 in the amount determined by the court. No such account, bill, or claim shall be allowed by the county board until the amount thereof shall have been determined by the court.

(2) This section does not apply to the public defender or to county conflict counsel as defined in section 29-3934.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 29;

Laws 2016, LB894, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 41.
July 18, 2026
Orders fixing fees for a court-appointed counsel in juvenile cases are final orders because they are made in a special proceeding and affect a substantial right. In re Claim of Roberts for Attorney Fees, 307 Neb. 346, 949 N.W.2d 299 (2020).

This section does not require that a county be notified when a fee application is filed by court-appointed counsel, nor does it require that an evidentiary hearing be routinely held on such an application. In re Claim of Roberts for Attorney Fees, 307 Neb. 346, 949 N.W.2d 299 (2020).

When a juvenile case is appealed, the appointed counsel should apply to the juvenile court, not the appellate court, for payment of services performed on appeal. In re Claim of Roberts for Attorney Fees, 307 Neb. 346, 949 N.W.2d 299 (2020).